Idaho statutes. Title 31 COUNTIES AND COUNTY LAW
Chapter 32 FEES
§ 31-3203. Sheriff’s fees.

The board of county commissioners of each respective county shall have the power to set sheriff’s fees by a resolution of the board for the services herein specified in an amount reasonably related to but not exceeding the actual costs of such service. The sheriff is allowed and may demand and receive such fees. In the event that the board of commissioners does not resolve to set fees by resolution as herein described, the sheriff is allowed and may demand and receive the fees hereinafter specified:

For serving summons and complaint, or any other process by which an action or proceeding is commenced, on each defendant ............................... $10.00

For serving an attachment on property, or levying an execution, except for a writ of wage garnishment or financial institution garnishment, or executing an order of arrest, or order for the delivery of personal property ............................... $10.00

For his trouble and expense in taking and keeping possession of and preserving property under attachment or execution, or other process, such sum as the court may order: provided, however, that said sum shall be no more than five dollars ($5.00) per diem or the reasonable costs incurred by a keeper in preserving said property.

For making and issuing a keeper’s receipt ............................... $5.00

For taking a bond or undertaking in any case in which he is authorized to take the same ............................... $10.00

For copy of and making return on any writ, except for a writ of wage garnishment or financial institution garnishment, process or other paper, when demanded or required by law ............................... $10.00

For serving every notice, rule or order ............................... $10.00

For making and posting notices, and advertising property for sale on attachment or execution, or under any judgment or order of sale, exclusive of the costs of publication, each notice, per folio ............................... $ 3.00

For serving a writ of possession or restitution, putting a person in possession of premises and removing the occupant ............................... $10.00

For holding each inquest, or trial of right of property, to include all services in the matter except mileage ............................... $ 3.00

For serving a subpoena, for each witness summoned ............................... $10.00

For commissions for receiving and paying over money on execution or other process, when land or personal property has been levied on and sold, on the first one thousand dollars ($1,000), two percent (2%); on all sums above that amount, one percent (1%); but in no case of sale of real estate shall his commission exceed the sum of ............................... $100.00

When the amount of such sale is credited on the debt and no money is transferred, then one-half (½) of such commission.

For commissions for receiving and paying over money on execution without levy, except for a writ of wage garnishment or financial institution garnishment, or where lands or goods levied on are not sold, on the first one thousand dollars ($1,000), one and one-half percent (1 ½%); and one-half (½) of one percent (1%) on all over that sum, but not to exceed in any case ............................... $75.00
The fees herein allowed for the levy of an execution, costs for advertising and percentage for making or collecting the money on execution, must be collected from the judgment debtor by virtue of such execution, in the same manner as the sum therein directed to be made.

For drawing and executing a sheriff’s deed, including the acknowledgment, to be paid by the grantee before delivery ............................... $10.00

For executing a certificate of sale, exclusive of the filing and recording of same ............................... $ 5.00

For making every arrest in a criminal proceeding ............................... $ 5.00

For summoning each juror ............................... $ 1.00

For serving a subpoena in a criminal action or proceeding, for each witness summoned ............................... $10.00

For traveling to serve any summons and complaint, or any other process, except for a writ of wage garnishment or financial institution garnishment, by which an action or proceeding is commenced, notice, rule, order, subpoena, venire, attachment on property, to levy an execution, to post notice of sale, to sell property under execution or other order of sale, or execute an order of arrest, or order for the delivery of personal property, writ of possession or restitution, to hold inquest or trial of right of property, for each mile actually and necessarily traveled for the first twenty-five (25) miles no charge shall be allowed, and for any miles traveled over twenty-five (25) miles, even if process is not served, the following shall be allowed, in going only ............................... $ .40

For traveling to execute any warrant of arrest, subpoena, venire or other process in criminal cases, or for taking a prisoner from prison, before a court or magistrate, or for taking a prisoner from the place of arrest to prison, or before a court or magistrate, for each mile actually and necessarily traveled, in going only ............................... $ .40

For each additional prisoner taken at the same time, per mile ............................... $ .25

But if any two (2) or more papers be required to be served in the same action or proceeding, civil or criminal, or be in the possession of the sheriff for service at the same time, and in the same direction, one (1) mileage only shall be charged; and in serving a subpoena, venire, process or paper, when two (2) or more jurors, witnesses, parties or persons to be served reside or are found in the same direction, traveling fees must be charged only for the most distant; and only one (1) mileage per day must be charged for taking a prisoner from prison before a court or magistrate; and constructive mileage must in no case be charged or allowed.

For all services under the election laws, the same mileage and fees as in this chapter provided for similar services.

For postage and processing of each mail renewal class D driver’s license authorized pursuant to section 49-319, Idaho Code ............................... $1.00

For wage and financial institution garnishment, the board of county commissioners shall set sheriff’s fees as set forth in section 11-729, Idaho Code.

§ 31-3204. Victim notification — Fee.

The court shall charge a fee of fifteen dollars ($15.00) for victim notification purposes to be paid by each person found guilty of each felony, misdemeanor or infraction under section 18-8001 or 49-301, Idaho Code, or first-time infraction under section 23-604 or 23-949, Idaho Code, except when the court orders such fee waived because the person is indigent and unable to pay such fee. Such fee shall be in addition to all other fines and fees levied. Such fee shall be paid to the county treasurer who shall, within five (5) days after the end of the month, pay such fees to the state treasurer for deposit in the state victim notification fund established in section 67-2912, Idaho Code.

§ 31-3205. Recorder’s fees.

The county recorder is allowed and may receive for his services the following fees to be paid him by the party procuring his services:

Except as otherwise set forth in this section, for recording every instrument, paper or notice, for the first page ............................... $ 10.00

For recording each of the following types of instruments, provided such instrument is thirty (30) pages or less:

Deeds, grants and transfers of title to real property ............................... $ 15.00

Trust deeds or mortgages of real property, including fixture filings, security agreements and assignments of leases and rents if contained within the same instrument for recording ............................... $ 45.00

Reconveyances of trust deeds, reconveyances of trust deeds that include a substitution of trustee if contained within the same instrument for recording, and releases of mortgages ............................... $ 15.00

Substitution of a trustee ............................... $ 10.00

Powers of attorney ............................... $ 25.00

For electronic copies (as defined in subsection (2) of this section) requested on a recurring basis, for each page or image ............................... 5¢

For copies of any record or paper, for each page ............................... $ 1.00

For each certificate under seal, when required ............................... $ 1.00

For release or assignment where more than one (1) document is released or assigned in the same instrument, for each additional release or assignment ............................... $ 1.00

For recording every town plat or map, for the first one hundred (100) lots or less ............................... $ 11.00

For taking acknowledgments, including seal ............................... $ 1.00

For filing a survey, for each page ............................... $ 5.00

For making a copy of a survey or highway right-of-way plat
............................... $ 4.00

For issuing marriage license, filing, recording and indexing the certificate of marriage and taking and filing affidavits required in issuance of the license ............................... $ 11.00

For administering an oath, including jurat ............................... $ 1.00

For comparing and certifying a prepared copy of a file or record in his office, for each page ............................... 50¢

For each certificate under seal, there shall be an additional fee of
............................... $ 1.00

Electronic copies shall include copies provided via internet download, on a compact disc, zip disc, floppy disc, or other electronic means. The county recorder shall provide electronic copies if the record is maintained in electronic form and if the person specifically requests an electronic copy.
(3) For duplication of recorded documents in paper, microfilm or microfiche format requested on a recurring basis in excess of one hundred (100) pages, the fee shall be negotiated between the county recorder and the purchaser of records. The fee shall not exceed the costs to the county recorder for the retrieval and duplication of the record. These negotiated fees shall be recommended by the county recorder and approved by the board of county commissioners. Any existing agreements for duplication of paper, microfilm or microfiche documents in excess of one hundred (100) pages are hereby ratified and approved. Any negotiated fees shall remain in effect until such time as either party requests a review of the fee.

For each additional page ............................... $ 3.00

For each additional page beyond thirty (30) pages for an instrument listed in this paragraph ............................... $ 3.00

And for each additional lot ............................... 5¢

And certifying the same when required, an additional sum of ............................... $ 1.00

(4) All instruments delivered to the county recorder for record shall be recorded rather than filed with the exception of plats, surveys, cornerstone markers and instruments under the uniform commercial code.

(5) For all other services as recorder, not enumerated herein, the fee fixed in the statute requiring the service or the same fee as allowed the clerk of the district court for like service.

(6) A page shall not exceed fourteen (14) inches in length nor eight and one-half (8 ½) inches in width. Each page shall be typewritten or be in legible writing. The recording fee to be charged for maps, sketches, drawings or other instruments except plats larger than the size permitted in this subsection for a page shall be two cents (2¢) per square inch.

§ 31-3206. Recorder — Exceptions to fee schedule.

Each county recorder shall record, free of charge, all clear lists of lands granted to the state by the United States.

§ 31-3207. Auditor’s fees.

For services as county auditor, not enumerated in this chapter, the fee fixed by the statute requiring the service shall be charged and collected, or the same fee as allowed the county recorder as provided by section 31-3205, Idaho Code, shall be charged and collected.

§ 31-3208. County surveyor’s fees. [Repealed.]

§ 31-3209. Justice of the peace

Fees. [Repealed.]

§ 31-3210. Constable’s fees. [Repealed.]

§ 31-3211. Fees to be prepaid — Exception — Penalty for official dereliction.

The officers mentioned in this title are not in any case, except for the state or county, to perform any official services unless upon prepayment of the fees prescribed for such services by law, except as in the succeeding sections provided: provided further, that the attorney-general or any prosecuting attorney may cause subpoenas to be issued on behalf of the state, without paying or tendering fees in advance to any officers, and on such payment the officer must perform the services required.

For every failure or refusal to perform official duty when the fees are tendered, the officer is liable on his official bond.

§ 31-3212. Exceptions to fee schedule — Habeas corpus — State or any county of Idaho a party — Cost of transcripts.

No filing or recording fee of any kind shall be charged or received by any county officer mentioned in this chapter for duties performed or services rendered in proceedings in habeas corpus, unless the habeas corpus petitioner is a prisoner as defined in section 31-3220A, Idaho Code.

County officers shall not charge any fee against, or receive any compensation whatever from, the state or any county of Idaho for any services rendered in any action or proceeding in which the state of Idaho, or any state board, or state officer in his official capacity, or any county of Idaho, or county officer in his official capacity, is a party.

If the habeas corpus petitioner or appellant is a prisoner, and is not an indigent prisoner as defined in section 31-3220A, Idaho Code, the prisoner may be required to pay all or part of the filing fees on appeal as set forth in sections 31-3201 and 31-3201A, Idaho Code. If the appellant is an indigent prisoner, as found by the court under section 31-3220A, Idaho Code, the transcript on appeal will be paid for as provided in section 1-1105(2), Idaho Code.

In habeas corpus cases on appeal to the supreme court of the state of Idaho, in which the appellant is not a prisoner but is otherwise restrained of his liberty by any public officer, the transcript for use on the appeal will be paid for by the appellant. If the appellant under this paragraph is indigent, the transcript and/or record for use on the appeal will be paid for in the manner as provided in section 1-1105(2), Idaho Code.

In habeas corpus cases on appeal to the supreme court of the state of Idaho, in which the custody of children is in controversy, the appellant, unless he be indigent, shall pay for the record on appeal. If the appellant under this paragraph is indigent, the record and/or transcript will be paid for as provided in section 1-1105(2), Idaho Code.

§ 31-3213. Pensioners exempt from paying fee — Penalty for charging.

No judge or clerk of court, county clerk, county auditor or any other county officer shall be allowed to charge any honorably discharged male or female veteran who had active service in any war or conflict officially engaged in by the government of the United States or their dependents or legal representative thereof, any fee for administering any oath or giving any official certificate for the procuring of any pension, bounty or back pay, nor for administering any oath or oaths and giving the certificate required upon any voucher for collection of periodical dues from the pension agent, nor any fee for services rendered in perfecting any voucher. Any such officer who may require and accept fees for such services shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor, and on conviction thereof shall be fined in any sum not less than ten dollars ($10.00) nor more than fifty dollars ($50.00).

§ 31-3214. Table of fees — Officers to publish — Penalty for neglect.

Every officer whose fees are herein ascertained must publish and set up in his office fair tables of his fees, according to this title, within one (1) month after he enters upon the duties of his office, in some conspicuous place, for inspection of all persons who have business in his office, upon pain of forfeiting for each day a sum not exceeding twenty dollars ($20.00), which may be recovered by any person by action before any justice of the peace of the same county, with costs.

§ 31-3215. Execution for fees.

If any clerk, sheriff, justice of the peace, or constable, shall not have received any fees which may be due him for services rendered in any suit or proceeding, he may have execution therefor, in his own name, against the party from whom they are due, to be issued from the court in which the action is pending.

§ 31-3216. Folio defined. [Repealed.]

§ 31-3217. Limitation on mileage of officer.

When any sheriff, constable or coroner serves more than one (1) process in the same case, not requiring more than one (1) journey from his office, he shall receive mileage only for the most distant service.

§ 31-3218. Receipt for fees.

Every officer upon receiving any fees for official duty or services, may be required by the person making the same to make out in writing and deliver to such person a particular account of such fees, specifying for what they respectively accrued, and shall receipt for the same; and if he refuses or neglects to do so, when required, or shall receive illegal fees, he shall be liable to the party paying for three (3) times the amount so paid.

§ 31-3219. Photographic copies of records — Fees.

The county recorder, and the clerk of the district court, is allowed, and may receive for his services, the following fees, to be paid him by the party procuring his services:

For photographic copies of any record the sum of $1.00 per page.

§ 31-3220. Inability to pay fees — Definitions — Affidavit.

For purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:

“Action” means any civil suit, action, proceeding or appeal of any such action, including a habeas corpus action, but excluding proceedings brought pursuant to chapter 49, title 19, Idaho Code.

“Court” means the district court (including its magistrates division), the court of appeals of Idaho or the supreme court of Idaho.

“Frivolous” means a claim which has no arguable basis in law or fact, or is substantially similar to a previous claim that has been dismissed with prejudice or is barred by res judicata or collateral estoppel.

“Indigent” means a person who is not a prisoner, as defined in section 31-3220A, Idaho Code, and who is found by the court to be unable to pay fees, costs or give security for the purpose of prepayment of fees, costs or security in a civil action.

“Malicious” means a claim which appears to be intended solely to harass the party.

The court may authorize the commencement or defense of any action without prepayment of fees, costs or security, by any indigent person not a prisoner, providing:

The person files an affidavit that he is indigent as provided in subsection (3) of this section, and unable to pay fees, costs or give security; and

The court finds, after informal inquiry, that the person is indigent for the purpose of prepayment of fees, costs or security.

The affidavit shall contain complete information as to:

The person’s identity;

The nature and amount of his income;

His spouse’s income;

The real and personal property owned;

His cash or checking accounts;

His dependents;

His debts;

His monthly expenses;

The nature of the action;

The affiant’s belief that he is entitled to redress.

No fees, costs or security shall be waived at the commencement of an action if the court finds and certifies in writing that the action is frivolous, malicious or otherwise not taken in good faith.

Upon the filing of an affidavit as set forth in this section and a finding that the person is indigent, the court may direct that the expense of printing the record and/or transcript for use on appeal be paid out of the district court fund of the county in which the action was filed.

The officers of the court shall issue and serve all process, and perform all duties in cases in which the person is found by the court to be indigent. Witnesses shall attend as in other cases, and the same remedies shall be available in other civil cases. Payment of fees for service of process and witnesses, where required, shall be paid out of the district court fund of the county in which the action is filed.

The court may retroactively require payment for any fees, costs or security which may have been waived in the action if the court finds that any allegation contained in the affidavit of inability to pay fees is untrue, or if the court is satisfied that the action is frivolous or malicious.

Judgment may be entered for attorney fees and costs at the conclusion of the action as in other cases. If the cost of the transcript or printed record has been paid out of the district court fund for the prevailing party, that party may be taxed in favor of the district court fund.

The affidavit shall also contain the following statements: “I am unable to pay the court costs. I verify that the statements made in this affidavit are true and correct.” The affidavit shall be sworn as required by law.

§ 31-3220A. Prisoner payment of fees at time of filing of action — Partial payment of fees — Dismissal of action.

For the purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:

“Action” means a civil suit, action, proceeding, or appeal of any such action, including habeas corpus, but excluding proceedings brought pursuant to chapter 49, title 19, Idaho Code.

“Inmate account” means an account managed by officials of state, local or private correctional facilities, as defined in section 18-101A, Idaho Code, to which the prisoner has access to purchase personal property from the correctional facility’s commissary in addition to property and supplies provided by the county, state or private correctional facility to meet the prisoner’s basic needs.

“Prisoner” shall have the meaning provided in section 18-101A, Idaho Code.

A prisoner who seeks to file an action with partial payment of court fees required in sections 31-3201 and 31-3201A, Idaho Code, shall file the following at the time of filing of an action:

A motion to proceed on partial payment of court fees under this section;

An affidavit of inability to pay all court fees at the time of filing the action, containing complete information as to:

The prisoner’s identity;

The nature and amount of the prisoner’s income;

The prisoner’s spouse’s income;

The real and personal property owned;

His cash or checking accounts;

His dependents;

His debts;

His monthly expenses;

The nature of the action;

The affiant’s belief that he is entitled to redress;

A certified copy of his inmate account that reflects the activity of his account over his period of incarceration or for twelve (12) months, whichever is less. The copy of the prisoner’s inmate account shall be certified by a custodian of inmate accounts of the office of the county sheriff, the department of correction, or the private correctional facility.

Upon review of the information provided and considering the prisoner’s ability to pay all court fees at the time of filing the action, the court shall order the prisoner to pay all or part of the court fees as set forth in sections 31-3201 and 31-3201A, Idaho Code.

If the court permits the prisoner’s action to proceed on partial payment of court fees, the court shall assess and, when funds exist, collect a partial payment of any court fees as set forth in sections 31-3201 and 31-3201A, Idaho Code, an initial partial filing fee of twenty percent (20%) of the greater of:
(a) The average monthly deposits to the prisoner’s inmate account; or

After payment of the initial partial filing fee, the prisoner shall be required to make monthly payments of twenty percent (20%) of the preceding month’s income credited to the prisoner’s inmate account until the full amount of all applicable court fees set forth in sections 31-3201 and 31-3201A, Idaho Code, are paid. The agency or entity having custody of the prisoner shall forward payments from the prisoner’s inmate account to the clerk of the court each time the amount in the prisoner’s inmate account exceeds ten dollars ($10.00) until the full amount of all applicable court fees set forth in sections 31-3201 and 31-3201A, Idaho Code, are paid.

In no event shall the court fees collected exceed the amount of fees permitted by statute for the commencement of an action.

In no event shall a prisoner be prohibited from bringing an action for the reason that the prisoner has no assets and no means by which to pay the initial partial filing fee.

The court may dismiss an action filed under this section, in whole or in part, on its own motion or by motion of a party, upon a finding that:

The prisoner has failed to pay the court fees under subsection (3) of this section within thirty (30) days of the entry of the order for court fees, or any time thereafter; or

Any allegation in the prisoner’s affidavit filed under this section is false.

If the action or any part of it is dismissed without prejudice under subsection (8) of this section, and the prisoner refiles the action, the following shall apply:

The requirements under this section must be met again in their entirety; and

No amount paid for court fees in any previously filed action, or any part thereof, shall be credited to the court fees required under sections 31-3201 and 31-3201A, Idaho Code.

The court may refuse further filings under this section until the order for court fees has been satisfied in any previous action filed under this section.

The office of the attorney general, the county prosecutor, or other counsel for the defendant or respondent, is authorized to receive information from the county sheriff, department of correction, or private correctional facility in order to verify the financial information submitted by a prisoner pursuant to this section.

The court may request an official or officials of the county jail, department of correction, or private correctional facility to file an affidavit concerning the allegations in the prisoner’s affidavit or concerning the merits of the action prior to determination whether to proceed under this section.

The court may require the prisoner to file an affidavit that the claim has not been previously brought against the same parties or from the same operative facts in any state or federal court.

The court may dismiss an action or a portion of the action under this section, before or after service, on its own motion or by motion of a party, upon a finding that:

Any allegation in the affidavit or the action is false;

The action is frivolous;

The action is malicious; or

The action fails to state a claim upon which relief can be granted.
(15) If a portion of the action is dismissed, the court’s order dismissing the action shall also designate the issues and the defendant or respondent upon which the action is to proceed.

If a portion of the action is dismissed, the court’s order dismissing the action shall also designate the issues and the defendant or respondent upon which the action is to proceed.

The court shall award reasonable costs and attorney’s fees to the defendant or respondent if the court finds that:

Any allegation in the prisoner’s affidavit is false;

The action or any part of the action is frivolous or malicious; or

The action or any part of the action is dismissed for failure to state a claim upon which relief can be granted.

Orders entered under this section are not subject to interlocutory appeal.

Nothing in this section shall prevent a prisoner from authorizing payment beyond that required under the order for filing fees.

If the court authorizes the commencement of the action or any part of the action without payment of fees upon a finding that the prisoner is unable to pay all court fees at the time of filing the action, and the court later finds that a prisoner is then able to pay all court fees, the court shall order the prisoner to pay all unpaid court fees within two (2) business days and enter an order for court fees. The court’s finding under this subsection may be based on information contained in affidavits or other information available to the court. The court shall dismiss the action if the prisoner fails to comply with an order entered under this subsection.

If the action or any part of it is dismissed without prejudice under subsection (19) of this section, and the prisoner refiles the action, the following shall apply:

The requirements under this section must be met again in their entirety; and

No amount paid for court fees in any previously filed action, or any part thereof, shall be credited to the court fees required under sections 31-3201 and 31-3201A, Idaho Code.

The court may develop a form questionnaire which it may require by local rule to be filed to implement this statute.

In no way shall this section be interpreted to create a liberty interest for prisoners entitling them to due process protection under the Idaho constitution or the United States constitution.

The affidavit shall also contain the following statements: “I am unable to pay all court costs at the time of filing the action. I verify that the statements made in this affidavit are true and correct.” The affidavit shall be sworn as required by law; and

Upon filing of the action and motion to proceed under this section, the prisoner shall also serve a copy of each document filed in compliance with this subsection upon counsel for the county sheriff, the department of correction, or the private correctional facility.

(b) The average monthly balance for the six (6) month period immediately preceding the filing of the action.

Partial Payments.

Although it was proper for the district court to assess a partial filing fee upon the filing of a prisoner civil rights complaint, it was error to dismiss the action when the prisoner offered evidence in a later motion that he did not have sufficient funds in his account to even cover the partial payment. Madison v. Craven, 141 Idaho 45, 105 P.3d 705 (Ct. App. 2005).

§ 31-3221. Payments to court by credit card or debit card.

The clerk of the district court may accept payment of a debt owed to the court by a credit card or debit card. Any person making payment on a debt owed to the court by a credit card or debit card shall be assessed an electronic payment convenience fee established by the supreme court, which shall include, among other costs, the amount charged the court by the issuer for the use of the card. This fee may also be paid by credit card or debit card and included in the transaction for the payment of the debt owed to the court. The electronic payment convenience fee shall be separate from the debt owed to the court and shall be deposited into the court technology fund created in section 1-1623, Idaho Code, and shall be used for the implementation of the provisions of this section. The debt owed to the court shall not be expunged, canceled, released, discharged or satisfied and any receipt or other evidence of payment shall be deemed conditional until the court has received final and unconditional payment of the full amount due from the financing agency or card issuer for the transaction. If an electronic payment once made is subsequently denied, revoked or otherwise canceled for any reason, and the payment is withdrawn from the court, the court may proceed as though payment had never been made.

Definitions. As used in this section:

“Cardholder” means the person or organization named on the face of a credit card or debit card to whom or for whose benefit the credit card or debit card is issued by an issuer.

“Credit card” means any instrument or device, whether known as a credit card or credit plate or by any other name, issued with or without a fee by an issuer for the use of the cardholder in obtaining money, property, goods, services or anything else of value on credit.

“Debit card” means any instrument or device, whether known as a debit card or by any other name, issued with or without a fee by an issuer for the use of the cardholder in depositing, obtaining or transferring funds.

“Debt owed to the court” means any assessment of fines, court costs, surcharges, penalties, fees, restitution, cash deposit of bail, moneys expended in providing counsel and other defense services to indigent defendants, or other charges which a court judgment has ordered to be paid to the court or which a party has agreed to pay in criminal or civil cases and includes any interest or penalty on such unpaid amounts as provided for in the judgment or by law.

“Issuer” means a business organization, financial institution or authorized agent of a business organization or financial institution that issues a credit card or debit card.

The supreme court may adopt rules as deemed appropriate for the administration of this section and may enter into contracts with an issuer or other organization to implement the provisions of this section.